New York, session 2025-2026, S10437.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 15-110.1 to read as follows: 3 § 15-110.1 Longevity bonuses. a. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of 4 law to the contrary, when a member shall have accrued twenty-five years 5 of uniformed service with the New York city fire department, and retires 6 in any rank, they shall have five per centum of the highest grade of pay 7 under the applicable collective bargaining agreement of such rank in 8 which they retire, added to the applicable salary, used for the purposes 9 of computing pension benefits under the plan in which they are enrolled 10 with the New York city fire department pension fund; or 11 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a 12 member shall have accrued thirty years of uniformed service with the New 13 York city fire department, and retires in any rank, they shall have ten 14 per centum of the highest grade of pay under the applicable collective 15 bargaining agreement of such rank in which they retire, added to the 16 applicable salary, used for the purposes of computing pension benefits 17 under the plan in which they are enrolled with the New York city fire 18 pension fund; or 19 (3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a 20 member shall have accrued thirty-five years of uniformed service with 21 the New York city fire department, and retires in any rank, they shall 22 have fifteen per centum of the highest grade of pay under the applicable 23 collective bargaining agreement of such rank in which they retire, added 24 to the applicable salary, used for the purposes of computing pension 25 benefits under the plan in which they are enrolled with the New York 26 city fire pension fund. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13849-01-5 S. 10437 2 1 b. In addition to the increases set forth in subdivision a of this 2 section, commencing with the twenty-sixth year of service and for each 3 year thereafter, such member shall receive an additional one per centum 4 annually, added to the applicable salary used for the purposes of 5 computing pension benefits under the plan in which they are enrolled 6 with the New York city fire pension fund, provided, however, that the 7 combined total additional credit shall not exceed fifteen per centum and 8 shall be capped upon the completion of thirty-five years of uniformed 9 service with the department. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.